Utah statutes.
17-21-25.   Names of persons signing to be typed or printed on instruments presented for recording.

(1) (a)  Each instrument presented to the county recorder for recording shall have typed or printed on it the name of each person whose signature appears on the instrument whose name is required to be indexed.

(b)  The person's typed or printed name shall appear just beneath that person's signature.

(2)  The requirements of Subsection (1) do not affect the legality of the instrument to be recorded.



Amended by Chapter 38, 2006 General Session

